Nevada, session 83, AB109.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 534A.040 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
534A.040 A consumptive or nonconsumptive use of water
brought to the surface [outside of a] to develop and obtain
geothermal [well] resources is subject to the appropriation
procedures of chapters 533 and 534 of NRS, except for:
1. Water [that is removed from an aquifer or geothermal
reservoir to develop and obtain geothermal resources if the water is
returned to or reinjected into the same aquifer or reservoir;] used in
an exploratory well; or
2. The reasonable loss of water:
(a) During a test of a geothermal well; or
(b) From the temporary failure of all or part of a system that
removes water from an aquifer or geothermal reservoir, transfers the
heat from that water and reinjects that water into the same aquifer or
reservoir.
Sec. 2. NRS 534A.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534A.050 1. The owner of real property owns the rights to
the underlying geothermal resources unless they have been reserved
by or conveyed to another person.
2. In accordance with NRS 533.025 and 534.020,
underground waters belong to the public and the use of such
underground waters for the development of geothermal resources
-
*AB109*

– 3 –
is subject to appropriation for beneficial use only under the laws
of this State.
Sec. 3. NRS 534A.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534A.060 1. A person may not drill or operate a geothermal
well or drill an exploratory well without obtaining [a] :
(a) A permit from the Administrator of the Division of Minerals
of the Commission on Mineral Resources ; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 534A.040, a permit to
appropriate water from the State Engineer in accordance with the
requirements of chapters 533 and 534 of NRS,
 and complying with the conditions of [the] each permit.
2. An application for a permit from the Administrator of the
Division of Minerals required pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 must set forth such information as the Administrator
requires by regulation.
Sec. 4. NRS 534A.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534A.070 1. The Administrator of the Division of Minerals
of the Commission on Mineral Resources shall approve or reject an
application for a permit to drill an exploratory well within 10 days
after the Administrator receives the application in proper form. The
permit must not be effective for more than 2 years, but may be
extended by the Administrator.
2. Upon receipt of an application for a permit to drill or operate
a geothermal well, the Administrator of the Division of Minerals
shall transmit copies of the application to the State Engineer, the
Administrator of the Division of Environmental Protection of the
State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, and
the Director of the Department of Wildlife. After consultation with
the State Engineer, the Administrator of the Division of
Environmental Protection, and the Director of the Department of
Wildlife, the Administrator of the Division of Minerals may issue a
permit to drill or operate a geothermal well if [it] :
(a) It is determined that issuance of a permit is consistent with:
[(a)] (1) The policies specified in NRS 445A.305 and
445B.100;
[(b)] (2) The [purposes] requirements of chapters 533 and 534
of NRS; and
[(c)] (3) The purposes specified in chapter 501 of NRS [.] ; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 534A.040, the State
Engineer has issued a permit to appropriate water.
3. The Administrator of the Division of Minerals shall approve
or reject the application to drill or operate a geothermal well within
90 days after the Administrator receives it in proper form, unless it
is determined that a conflict exists pursuant to subsection 2 or a
public hearing is necessary pursuant to subsection 4. Notice of the
-
*AB109*

– 4 –
conflict or need for a public hearing must be provided to the
applicant within the 90-day period.
4. The State Engineer and the Administrator of the Division of
Minerals may hold public hearings jointly or separately to gather
such evidence or information as they deem necessary for a full
understanding of all the rights involved and to guard properly the
public interest.
5. A permit issued pursuant to this section must include any
conditions:
(a) Deemed necessary by the Administrator of the Division of
Minerals to carry out the purposes of this section; and
(b) Imposed by the State Engineer consistent with the provisions
of chapters 533 and 534 of NRS.
Sec. 5. NRS 534B.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534B.010 1. The provisions of this chapter govern
exploration for dissolved mineral resources.
2. Ownership of dissolved mineral resources is determined by
the applicable federal and state laws or regulations. In accordance
with NRS 533.025 and 534.020, underground waters containing
dissolved mineral resources belong to the public and are subject to
appropriation for beneficial use only under the laws of this State.
3. Except as expressly provided, nothing in this chapter shall
be construed to abrogate the provisions of chapter 445A, 519A, 533,
534 or 534A of NRS.
Sec. 6. NRS 534B.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534B.080 1. A person may not drill a dissolved mineral
resource exploration well without first obtaining a permit from the
Administrator and complying with the conditions of the permit.
2. To obtain a permit to drill a dissolved mineral resource
exploration well, a person must submit an application for a permit to
the Administrator in the form and containing such information as
prescribed by the Administrator in accordance with regulations
adopted pursuant to this chapter.
3. An application submitted pursuant to subsection 2 must
include:
(a) The location, design and expected depth of the well;
(b) The materials of construction for the well;
(c) The status of the land on which the well will be constructed;
(d) A plan for monitoring the well and a plan for plugging and
abandoning the well in accordance with any regulations adopted
pursuant to this chapter;
(e) A plan for managing any fluids generated as part of testing
or sampling, which must include, without limitation, a description of
how the fluids will be managed in accordance with the requirements
of chapter 445A of NRS and as required by the Division of
-
*AB109*

– 5 –
Environmental Protection of the State Department of Conservation
and Natural Resources; and
(f) Any other reporting, information or analysis necessary to
prevent the migration of fluids between aquifers and the degradation
of the water quality in accordance with any regulations adopted
pursuant to this chapter.
4. Upon receipt of an application submitted pursuant to
subsection 2, the Administrator shall transmit a copy of the
application to the State Engineer for review. If the State Engineer
determines that a dissolved mineral resource exploration well or a
dissolved mineral resource exploration borehole may impact
existing rights or protectable interests in existing domestic wells or
prove detrimental to the public interest, the State Engineer shall
require that the applicant obtain a permit to appropriate water in
accordance with the requirements of chapters 533 and 534 of
NRS.
5. In addition to any other requirement of this section, a
dissolved mineral resource exploration well or a dissolved mineral
resource exploration borehole must be drilled by a person who is
licensed to drill wells pursuant to NRS 534.140.
[5.] 6. The issuance of a permit pursuant to NRS 534B.090
does not authorize a person to produce dissolved mineral resources
without a water right.
Sec. 7. NRS 534B.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534B.090 1. The Administrator shall approve or reject an
application for a permit to drill a dissolved mineral resource
exploration well within 30 days after the Administrator receives an
application in proper form, unless [the] :
(a) The Administrator determines that the application conflicts
with the requirements of NRS 445A.300 to 445A.730, inclusive,
and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or any other laws and
regulations administered by the Division of Environmental
Protection of the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources [.] ; or
(b) The State Engineer requires the applicant to obtain a
permit to appropriate water pursuant to NRS 534B.080.
2. A permit issued pursuant to this section must not be
effective for more than 2 years, but may be extended one time by
the Administrator for an additional 2 years if he or she determines
that the permit complies with the requirements of this chapter and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
3. The Administrator and the State Engineer may hold public
hearings jointly or separately to gather such evidence or information
as they deem necessary for a full understanding of all the rights
involved and to properly guard the public interest. The
-
*AB109*

– 6 –
Administrator and the State Engineer, as applicable, must notify
the applicant [, the State Engineer] and the Administrator of the
Division of Environmental Protection of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources in advance of any hearing held
pursuant to this section.
4. A permit issued pursuant to this section must include any
conditions and reporting requirements deemed necessary by the
Administrator.
5. The holder of any permit issued pursuant to this section must
comply with the requirements of NRS 445A.300 to 445A.730,
inclusive, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
6. The Administrator shall post any permit which has been
approved pursuant to this section on the Internet website of the
Division of Minerals within 5 days after the permit has been
approved.
Sec. 8. NRS 534B.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534B.110 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
534B.080, the appropriation procedures of chapters 533 and 534 of
NRS do not apply to the reasonable loss of water of not more than 5
acre-feet during the testing and sampling of water pumped within a
dissolved mineral resource exploration project.
2. Any water pumped in excess of 5 acre-feet within a
dissolved mineral resource exploration project is subject to the
appropriation procedures of chapters 533 and 534 of NRS. An
operator of a dissolved mineral resource exploration project must
ensure that the project is in compliance with the appropriation
requirements of chapters 533 and 534 of NRS before the project
exceeds the threshold of 5-acre-feet.
3. As used in this section, “dissolved mineral resource
exploration project” means a project, which may consist of one or
more dissolved mineral resource exploration wells or boreholes or
both, that is conducted on:
(a) Private land owned or controlled by a natural person or an
exploration or mining company; or
(b) A mining claim on public land that is identified in an
approved notice or plan required pursuant to 43 C.F.R §§ 3809.300
to 3809.336, inclusive, or 3809.400 to 3809.434, inclusive.
H
-
*AB109*